District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-507

Liability of limited partner to creditors.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 656, Pub. L. 87-716, § 7
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-207.
1973 Ed., § 41-407.